Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF560.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2688YH (3) 91 lh/ko H.F. 560 Section 1. Section 601.1, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. Subject to section 147.164 , a A parent or guardian 3 bears the ultimate responsibility, and has the fundamental, 4 constitutionally protected right, to make decisions affecting 5 the parentâs or guardianâs minor child, including decisions 6 related to the minor childâs medical care, moral upbringing, 7 religious upbringing, residence, education, and extracurricular 8 activities. Any and all restrictions of this right shall be 9 subject to strict scrutiny. 10 Sec. 2. REPEAL. Section 147.164, Code 2025, is repealed. 11 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 12 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 13 Sec. 4. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 14 retroactively to March 22, 2023. 15